Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2899.3 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of implementing the provisions of Sections
8E and 8F of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, the Oklahoma
Tax Commission shall prescribe a form for use by each county
assessor and county treasurer within this state that shall be used
Req. No. 15440 Page 1

by d isabled veterans and their surviving spouse, as described by
Sections 8E and 8F of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, after
a real estate closing where the sale takes place after January 1 of
each tax year.
B. The form required by subsection A of this act shall include,
but not be limited to, information stating the disabled veteran or
their surviving spouse previously qualified for the exempt treatment
pursuant to Section 8E or 8F of Article X of the Oklahoma
Constitution on their homestead prior to acquiring title to a new
homestead. The county assessor in the applicable county shall use
the information from the form after verifying its accuracy and shall
take such steps as required to modify the assessment roll to reflect
the exempt status of the newly acquired homestead by the disabled
veteran or their surviving spouse.
C. The county assessor and county treasurer shall take such
steps as may be required in order to send an ad valorem tax bill to
the homestead formerly occupied by the disabled veteran or their
surviving spouses, if applicable.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15440 AO 01/12/26



Req. No. 15440 Page 2